Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.535.050

Authority to borrow, issue bonds.

If the indebtedness of such school district is validated and ratified, as provided in this chapter, by three-fifths of the voters voting at such election, the board of directors of such school district, without any further vote, may borrow money and issue and sell negotiable bonds therefor in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

[ 1984 c 186 s 14; 1983 c 167 s 28; 1975 c 43 s 2; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.52.050. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 333 s 5; RRS s 4960; prior: 1897 c 118 s 132; 1895 c 21 s 5. Formerly RCW 28A.52.050, 28.52.050.]

NOTES:

Purpose—1984 c 186: See note following RCW 39.46.110.

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.

Effective date—1975 c 43: "The effective date of this amendatory act shall be July 1, 1975." [ 1975 c 43 s 37.]

Severability—1975 c 43: "If any provision of this amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1975 c 43 s 38.]